Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2387
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Public Funds Deposit Security Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Affiliate means any entity that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another entity;

(2) Bank means any state-chartered or federally chartered bank which has a main chartered office in this state, any branch thereof in this state, or any branch in this state of a state-chartered or federally chartered bank which maintained a main chartered office in this state prior to becoming a branch of such state-chartered or federally chartered bank;

(3) Capital stock financial institution means a capital stock state building and loan association, a capital stock federal savings and loan association, a capital stock federal savings bank, and a capital stock state savings bank, which has a main chartered office in this state, any branch thereof in this state, or any branch in this state of a capital stock financial institution which maintained a main chartered office in this state prior to becoming a branch of such capital stock financial institution;

(4) Control means to own directly or indirectly or to control in any manner twenty-five percent of the voting shares of any bank, capital stock financial institution, or holding company or to control in any manner the election of the majority of directors of any bank, capital stock financial institution, or holding company;

(5) Custodial official means an officer or an employee of the State of Nebraska or any political subdivision who, by law, is made custodian of or has control over public money or public funds subject to the act or the security for the deposit of public money or public funds subject to the act;

(6) Deposit guaranty bond means a bond underwritten by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state which provides coverage for deposits of a governing authority which are in excess of the amounts insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;

(7) Director means the Director of Banking and Finance;

(8) Event of default means the issuance of an order by a supervisory authority or a receiver which restrains a bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution from paying its deposit liabilities;

(9) Governing authority means the official, or the governing board, council, or other body or group of officials, authorized to designate a bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution as a depository of public money or public funds subject to the act;

(10) Governmental unit means the State of Nebraska or any political subdivision thereof;

(11) Political subdivision means any county, city, village, township, district, authority, or other public corporation or entity, whether organized and existing under direct provisions of the Constitution of Nebraska or laws of the State of Nebraska or by virtue of a charter, corporate articles, or other legal instruments executed under authority of the constitution or laws, including any entity created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act;

(12) Qualifying mutual financial institution shall have the same meaning as in section 77-2365.01;

(13) Repurchase agreement means an agreement to purchase securities by the governing authority by which the counterparty bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution will repurchase the securities on or before a specified date and for a specified amount and the counterparty bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution will deliver the underlying securities to the governing authority by book entry, physical delivery, or third-party custodial agreement. The transfer of underlying securities to the counterparty bank's, capital stock financial institution's, or qualifying mutual financial institution's customer book entry account may be used for book entry delivery if the governing authority so chooses; and

(14) Securities means:

(a) Bonds or obligations fully and unconditionally guaranteed both as to principal and interest by the United States Government;

(b) United States Government notes, certificates of indebtedness, or treasury bills of any issue;

(c) United States Government bonds;

(d) United States Government guaranteed bonds or notes;

(e) Bonds or notes of United States Government agencies;

(f) Bonds of any state or political subdivision which are fully defeased as to principal and interest by any combination of bonds or notes authorized in subdivision (c), (d), or (e) of this subdivision;

(g) Bonds or obligations, including mortgage-backed securities and collateralized mortgage obligations, issued by or backed by collateral one hundred percent guaranteed by the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, the Federal Farm Credit System, a Federal Home Loan Bank, or the Federal National Mortgage Association;

(h) Student loans backed or partially guaranteed by the United States Department of Education;

(i) Repurchase agreements the subject securities of which are any of the securities described in subdivisions (a) through (g) of this subdivision;

(j) Securities issued under the authority of the Federal Farm Loan Act;

(k) Loan participations which carry the guarantee of the Commodity Credit Corporation, an instrumentality of the United States Department of Agriculture;

(l) Guaranty agreements of the Small Business Administration of the United States Government;

(m) Bonds or obligations of any county, city, village, metropolitan utilities district, public power and irrigation district, sewer district, fire protection district, rural water district, or school district in this state which have been issued as required by law;

(n) Bonds of the State of Nebraska or of any other state which are purchased by the Board of Educational Lands and Funds of this state for investment in the permanent school fund or which are purchased by the state investment officer of this state for investment in the permanent school fund;

(o) Bonds or obligations of another state, or a political subdivision of another state, which are rated within the two highest classifications by at least one of the standard rating services, with such classifications to include the underlying credit rating or enhanced credit rating, whichever is higher, with respect to bonds or obligations of a political subdivision of another state;

(p) Warrants of the State of Nebraska;

(q) Warrants of any county, city, village, local hospital district, or school district in this state;

(r) Irrevocable, nontransferable, unconditional standby letters of credit issued by a Federal Home Loan Bank; and

(s) Certificates of deposit fully insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation that are issued to a bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution furnishing securities pursuant to the Public Funds Deposit Security Act.

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 275, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 39;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 82;

Laws 2001, LB 420, § 35;

Laws 2003, LB 131, § 37;

Laws 2003, LB 175, § 14;

Laws 2004, LB 999, § 50;

Laws 2009, LB259, § 27;

Laws 2011, LB78, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB155, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB622, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 93;

Laws 2022, LB707, § 59.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.